Tennessee, session 114, SB1415.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-15-401(d)(2), is amended by
deleting "subsection (d)" and substituting "subdivision (d)(1)".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-15-401(d), is amended by
designating the current language as subdivision (d)(1) and adding the following as a new
subdivision (d)(2):
(2)
(A) A person who knowingly, by act or omission, engages in conduct that
places a child in imminent danger of death, bodily injury, or physical or mental
impairment commits a Class E felony; except that if the abused child is eight (8)
years of age or less, then the penalty is a Class B felony.
(B) For purposes of this subdivision (d)(2), a person engages in conduct
that places a child in imminent danger of death, bodily injury, or physical or
mental impairment if the person unlawfully possesses any amount of fentanyl,
carfentanil, remifentanil, alfentanil, or thiafentanil in the presence of the child.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1415
001465
- 1 -